Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2265
Suspect, defined.

Suspect shall mean unable to be classified as positive or negative, as determined by the department, based on the results of an official test.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 54-2215;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 30.